Tennessee, session 114, SB1872.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-5-118, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting instead:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, the department of human services
serves as the state disbursement unit. The department must establish, advertise, and
maintain a customer service unit for the express purpose of receiving and responding to
citizen inquiries and complaints concerning child support collections and disbursements.
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, if the department retains a contractor to
fulfill the department's obligations under this section, then the contractor must establish,
advertise, and maintain a customer service unit for the express purpose of receiving and
responding to citizen inquiries and complaints concerning child support collections and
disbursements.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-5-119, is amended by deleting the
section in its entirety.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1872
010038
- 1 -